Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,134
Motor vehicle theft or fraud; terms, defined.

As used in sections 44-3,134 to 44-3,142, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Authorized agency shall mean the Nebraska State Patrol, a local governmental police department, a county sheriff's office, a county attorney, a municipal attorney, a United States district attorney, a duly constituted criminal investigative agency of the United States Government, and the office of the Nebraska Attorney General;

(2) Insurer shall mean any insurance company, adjustor, or agent; and

(3) Relevant shall mean having a tendency to make the existence of any information that is of consequence to an investigation of motor vehicle theft or motor vehicle insurance fraud or a determination of such issue more probable or less probable than it would be without such information.

Laws 1987, LB 78, § 1.